Utah statutes.
53B-13-112.   Separation of duties, responsibilities, funds, liabilities, and expenses -- Immunity from personal liability.

(1)  The duties, responsibilities, funds, liabilities, and expenses of the board under this chapter shall be maintained wholly separate and apart from their other duties, responsibilities, funds, liabilities, and expenses.

(2)  A member of the board or a person executing the notes, bonds, or other obligations of the board is not personally liable for the repayment of the note, bond, or other obligation or subject to personal liability or accountability by reason of its issuance or nonissuance.

